Wisconsin, session 2025, AB171.
do enact as follows:AB171,11Section 1. 59.43 (1r) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 235, is 2renumbered 59.43 (1r) (a) and amended to read:AB171,2,9359.43 (1r) (a) The Except as otherwise required by law, the register of deeds 4shall shield from disclosure and keep confidential documents containing personal 5information covered by a written request of a judicial officer under s. 757.07 (4), if 6the judicial officer specifically identifies the document number of any document to 7be shielded under this subsection. This subsection applies only to electronic images 8of documents specifically identified by a judicial officer as covered by a written 9request under s. 757.07 (4).AB171,2,1110(b) The register of deeds may allow a 3rd party access to a document subject to 11protection under this subsection only if the at least one of the following is true:AB171,2,12121. The judicial officer consents to the access or access.AB171,2,13132. Access is otherwise permitted as provided under s. 757.07 (4) (e).AB171,214Section 2. 59.43 (1r) (b) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB171,2,151559.43 (1r) (b) 3. The 3rd party meets any of the following criteria:AB171,2,1616a. Possesses a signed consent document described under s. 757.07 (4) (e) 3.AB171,2,1717b. Is subject to the requirements of 15 USC 6801, et seq.AB171,2,1818c. Executes a confidentiality agreement with the register of deeds.AB171,3,219d. Is a title insurance company, as defined in s. 708.15 (1) (v), an authorized 1agent of a title insurance company, or any attorney licensed to practice law in this 2state.AB171,33Section 3. 757.07 (1) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB171,3,94757.07 (1) (am) “Designated officer” means the officer or employee of a 5government agency, the register of deeds, or a provider of a land records website 6designated in writing to the director of state courts. In the absence of a written 7designation to the director of state courts, “designated officer” means the highest 8ranking officer or employee for a government agency, the register of deeds, or any 9provider of a land records website.AB171,410Section 4. 757.07 (1) (em) of the statutes is created to read:AB171,3,1411757.07 (1) (em) “Land records website” means a public website or public 12online database that allows the general public to search and retrieve a real estate 13property database or geographic records. “Land records website” does not include a 14website administered by the register of deeds.AB171,515Section 5. 757.07 (1) (g) 1. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 16235, is amended to read:AB171,3,1817757.07 (1) (g) 1. A home address directly associated with or displayed with the 18judicial officer’s name.AB171,619Section 6. 757.07 (1) (i) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 20235, is amended to read:AB171,4,221757.07 (1) (i) “Publicly post or display” means to intentionally communicate or 22otherwise make available to the general public, but does not include a direct 23communication with a judicial officer or any immediate family member of a judicial 1officer, including a written communication mailed to a judicial officer’s home 2address.AB171,73Section 7. 757.07 (1) (im) of the statutes is created to read:AB171,4,54757.07 (1) (im) “Secondary residence” means a residence for personal use that 5is not a person’s permanent residence but where a person regularly resides.AB171,86Section 8. 757.07 (1) (k) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 7235, is amended to read:AB171,4,138757.07 (1) (k) “Written request” means a notarized written notice signed by a 9judicial officer or a representative of the judicial officer’s employer requesting a 10government agency, business, association, or other person to refrain from publicly 11posting or displaying publicly available content that includes the personal 12information of the judicial officer or judicial officer’s immediate family completed 13and filed pursuant to sub. (4).AB171,914Section 9. 757.07 (2) (a) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 15235, is amended to read:AB171,5,416757.07 (2) (a) A government agency may not publicly post or display publicly 17available content that includes a judicial officer’s personal information, provided 18that the government agency has received a written request in accordance with sub. 19(4) that it refrain from disclosing the judicial officer’s personal information. After a 20government agency has received a written request, that agency shall remove the 21judicial officer’s personal information from publicly available content within 10 22business days. After the government agency has removed the judicial officer’s 23personal information from publicly available content, the agency may not publicly 24post or display the information, and the judicial officer’s personal information shall 1be exempt from inspection and copying under s. 19.35 unless the government 2agency has received consent as provided under sub. (4) (e) to make the personal 3information available to the public or unless the government agency is required by 4law to publicly post or display the judicial officer’s personal information.AB171,105Section 10. 757.07 (2) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB171,5,76757.07 (2) (c) Paragraph (a) does not apply to a register of deeds or a land 7records website.AB171,118Section 11. 757.07 (4) (b) 1. a. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin 9Act 235, is amended to read:AB171,5,1110757.07 (4) (b) 1. a. Sends the written request directly to the designated officer 11of a government agency, person, data broker, business, or association.AB171,1212Section 12. 757.07 (4) (b) 2. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 13235, is amended to read:AB171,5,2114757.07 (4) (b) 2. In each quarter of a calendar year, the director of state courts 15shall provide to the appropriate designated officer with ultimate supervisory 16authority for a government agency a list of all judicial officers who have submitted 17a written request under subd. 1. b. The designated officer shall promptly provide a 18copy of the list to the government agencies under his or her supervision. Receipt of 19the written request list compiled by the director of state courts office by a 20government agency shall constitute a written request to that agency for purposes of 21this subsection.AB171,1322Section 13. 757.07 (4) (d) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 23235, is amended to read:AB171,6,1124757.07 (4) (d) A judicial officer’s written request shall be made on a form 1prescribed by the director of state courts and shall specify what personal 2information shall be maintained as private to the extent permitted in this section 3and s. 59.43 (1r) and shall describe with reasonable particularity the records the 4judicial officer believes to contain the personal information. If a judicial officer 5wishes to identify a secondary residence as a home address, the designation shall 6be made in the written request. A judicial officer’s written request shall disclose 7the identity of the officer’s immediate family and indicate that the personal 8information of these family members shall also be excluded to the extent that it 9could reasonably be expected to reveal personal information of the judicial officer. 10Any person receiving a written request form submitted by or on behalf of a judicial 11officer under this paragraph shall treat the submission as confidential.AB171,1412Section 14. 757.07 (4) (e) 1. of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 13235, is amended to read:AB171,6,1814757.07 (4) (e) 1. A judicial officer’s written request is valid for 10 years or until 15the judicial officer’s death, whichever occurs first, provided that a judicial officer 16updates his or her written request within 90 days of the date any home address 17identified in the judicial officer’s written request ceases to be a home address for 18any reason.AB171,1519Section 15. 757.07 (4) (e) 2. d. of the statutes is created to read:AB171,6,2020757.07 (4) (e) 2. d. As otherwise expressly permitted under this section.AB171,1621Section 16. 757.07 (4m) (a) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 22235, is repealed.AB171,1723Section 17. 757.07 (4m) (b) of the statutes, as created by 2023 Wisconsin Act 24235, is amended to read:AB171,7,61757.07 (4m) (b) Any provider of a public-facing land records website shall 2establish a process for judicial officers and immediate family members of judicial 3officers to Judicial officers may opt out from the display and search functions of 4their names and the names of their immediate family members on the any 5provider’s public-facing land records website by submitting a written request under 6sub. (4) to the provider.AB171,187Section 18. 757.07 (4m) (c) of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab171 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab171 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB171 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB171 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB171: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting